Hawaii statutes.
§635-20 Less than unanimous verdict
authorized. In all civil cases tried before a jury it shall be sufficient
for the return of a verdict if at least five-sixths of the jurors agree on the
verdict. [L 1965, c 171, §1; Supp, §231-28; HRS §635-20]

Cross References

Trial by jury, see Const. Art. I, §13.

Rules of Court

See HRCP rule 48.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next